Oklahoma, session 2026, SB865.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 569 of Title 57, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 675 Page 1


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma


Public Safety and Immigration Enforcement Act”.


B. As used in the Oklahoma Public Safety and Immigration


Enforcement Act:


1. “Secure Interagency Collaboration Platform” refers to a


technology system established under this act for data sharing and


coordination among relevant agencies; and


2. “Unauthorized immigrant” means a person who does not have


legal authorization to reside in the United States.


C. 1. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall


develop and implement a Secure Interagency Collaboration Platform to


facilitate real-time communication and data sharing among:


a. law enforcement agencies of this state,


b. the Department of Corrections, and


c. federal immigration authorities, including the United


States Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE).


2. The Secure Interagency Collaboration Platform shall:


a. integrate existing databases from participating


agencies to enable comprehensive tracking of


individuals,


b. include advanced security measures to protect


sensitive data and ensure compliance with privacy laws


of this state,



Req. No. 675 Page 2


c. provide automated alerts to participating agencies


when an unauthorized immigrant is identified within


the criminal justice system, and


d. offer case management tools to track the status of


unauthorized immigrants from arrest to deportation


proceedings.


3. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall


oversee the development, implementation, and maintenance of the


Secure Interagency Collaboration Platform and promulgate rules to


enact the provisions of this subsection.


D. 1. Law enforcement agencies within this state shall:


a. report any arrest of an individual suspected of being


an unauthorized immigrant to the Department of


Corrections and federal immigration authorities


through the Secure Interagency Collaboration Platform,


and


b. provide relevant data, including biometric


information, to facilitate identification and status


verification of any individual suspected of being an


unauthorized immigrant.


2. The Department of Corrections shall:


a. screen any individual that enters a state correctional


facility to identify an unauthorized immigrant through



Req. No. 675 Page 3


the use of the Secure Interagency Collaboration


Platform, and


b. notify federal immigration authorities of any


confirmed unauthorized immigrant who meets the


criteria outlined in this act.


3. Federal immigration authorities shall prioritize cooperation


with agencies of this state to expedite deportation proceedings for


any unauthorized immigrant identified pursuant to the provisions of


this act.


E. 1. Any participating agency shall receive training on the


use of the Secure Interagency Collaboration Platform and the


requirements of the Oklahoma Public Safety and Immigration


Enforcement Act.


2. Any agency that fails to comply with the reporting and


collaboration requirements provided in this act may be subject to an


administrative penalty as determined by the Office of Management and


Enterprise Services.


F. The Department of Corrections and the Office of Management


and Enterprise Services are authorized to seek federal grants and


other funding sources to implement the provisions of this act.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby



Req. No. 675 Page 4


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-675 CN 1/19/2025 5:44:52 AM









































Req. No. 675 Page 5